Illinois, session 104th, HB1811.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 316.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/316.1)7    Sec. 316.1. Access to the integration of pharmacy records 8with the Prescription Monitoring Program.9    (a) Subject to the requirements and limitations set out in 10this Section and in administrative rule, the Department shall 11not require, either expressly or effectively, Electronic 12Health Records Systems, pharmacies, or other providers to 13utilize a particular entity or system for access to the 14integration of pharmacy records with the Prescription 15Monitoring Program.16        (1) Any entity or system for integration (transmitting 17    the data maintained by the Prescription Monitoring 18    Program) into an Electronic Health Records System, 19    Certified Health IT Module, Pharmacy Dispensing System, or 20    Pharmacy Management System must meet applicable 21    requirements outlined in administrative rule, including, 22    but not limited to, the following:23            (A) enter into a data sharing agreement with the   HB1811- 2 -LRB104 06256 RLC 16291 b1        Department of Human Services, Prescription Monitoring 2        Program;3            (B) all security requirements noted within this 4        Section, administrative rule, and all other applicable 5        State and federal security and privacy requirements;6            (C) the Prescription Monitoring Program shall have 7        administrative control over the approval of each site 8        and individual integration point and the Prescription 9        Monitoring Program shall have the ability to disable 10        individual integration points, at no additional cost 11        to the State;12            (D) interstate data sharing shall be completed 13        with written authorization from the Prescription 14        Monitoring Program;15            (E) data available from the Prescription 16        Monitoring Program shall not be stored, cached, or 17        sold and the State may inspect and review an entity or 18        system for integration to assure and confirm the same, 19        subject to a reasonable non-disclosure agreement, as 20        permitted by State law, to protect the entity's or 21        system's trade secrets or other proprietary 22        information;23            (F) analysis of data shall only be allowed with 24        express written permission from the Prescription 25        Monitoring Program; and26            (G) access to audit data, shall be available in   HB1811- 3 -LRB104 06256 RLC 16291 b1        hourly to real-time increments at no cost to the 2        State.3        (2) Electronic Health Record Systems, Certified Health 4    IT Modules, Pharmacy Management Systems, and Pharmacy 5    Dispensing Systems integrated with the Prescription 6    Monitoring Program must meet applicable requirements 7    outlined in rule, including, but not limited to, the 8    following:9            (A) provide their customers (healthcare entity, 10        pharmacy, provider, prescriber, dispenser, etc.) the 11        choice of approved integration vendor, meeting the 12        requirements of this Section and administrative rule, 13        or direct connect to the Illinois Prescription 14        Monitoring Program;15            (B) provide their customers with access to the 16        data provided by the customer's chosen integration 17        vendor as allowed under State and federal statute; and18            (C) follow all State and federal security and 19        privacy standards.20        (3) Customers required to integrate under State or 21    federal law must meet the requirements outlined in 22    administrative rule, including, but not limited to, the 23    following:24            (A) the customer retains the choice of which 25        integration vendor or direct connect is utilized to 26        connect to the Illinois Prescription Monitoring   HB1811- 4 -LRB104 06256 RLC 16291 b1        Program; and2            (B) customers seeking to contract with a new 3        integration vendor, shall enter into a memorandum of 4        understanding with the Prescription Monitoring 5        Program.6    (b) The Illinois Prescription Monitoring Program may 7exercise the power, by rule, to require Memoranda of 8Understanding with all customers. The general contents of the 9memorandum of understanding shall be set out in rule and shall 10include, but not be limited to:11        (1) the acknowledgment and choice of the customer of 12    the method of integration with the Prescription Monitoring 13    Program and14        (2) the data use and other requirements on the 15    customer in accessing and using the Prescription 16    Monitoring Program.17    A fee cannot be levied as part of a memorandum of 18understanding required by the Department under this Section.19    (c) Non-compliance by the Integration Vendor, Electronic 20Health Record System, Certified Health IT Module, Pharmacy 21Management System or Pharmacy Dispensing System, customer, or 22any parties required to comply with this Section may result in 23the party being prohibited from serving as entity or system 24for integration with the Prescription Monitoring Program, 25termination of contracts, agreements, or other business 26relationships. The Department shall institute appropriate cure   HB1811- 5 -LRB104 06256 RLC 16291 b1notices, as necessary to remedy non-compliance.2    (d) Interstate data sharing agreements shall be mutual. 3The Department shall only share data if the reciprocal state 4provides equal access to data of the reciprocating state to 5all authorized users, licensed health care entities, and 6application vendors regardless of their method of connection 7to the Prescription Monitoring Program for interstate data 8sharing. 9(Source: P.A. 103-477, eff. 7-1-24.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.